Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.1 Narcotic Guidance Council

21-28.1-1.
Creation of narcotic guidance council.

The city or town council of any city or town in this state may, by resolution, create one or more narcotic guidance councils.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 24, § 2.

21-28.1-2.
Powers and duties.

Narcotic guidance councils shall develop a program of community participation regarding control of the use of narcotics at the local level. These councils shall direct themselves toward accomplishing the following:

Make immediately available to the community, basic knowledge acquired in the field of drug use especially by youth;

Create a climate in which persons seeking assistance in coping with narcotics problems can meet, without embarrassment, with responsible individuals or agencies in a position to render assistance;

Authorize persons approved by the council to contact and counsel persons within the community suspected of using narcotics or those persons allegedly having knowledge of that usage; and

Cooperate with other narcotic guidance councils and with the state, and federal narcotics commissions and agencies in bringing local and community trouble areas to their attention.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 24, § 1.

21-28.1-3.
Composition of councils.

Narcotic guidance councils shall consist of not less than three (3) nor more than five (5) members who shall be appointed by the local city or town councils for a term not exceeding three (3) years and shall whenever practicable include at least one member of the clergy, one attorney and one physician.

The presiding officer or chairperson of the council shall be designated by the local city or town council from among the members as appointed to the council. The local city or town council shall have authority to remove any member of the council appointed for cause, after a public hearing, if requested. A vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as an original appointment. The local city or town council may provide for compensation to be paid to the members of the council and is also empowered and authorized to make any appropriation for expenses incurred by the council. The council may appoint any clerks and other employees as it may require with the approval of the local city or town council. The services and expenses of the council shall not exceed the appropriation that may be made for them by the local city or town council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 24, § 1.

21-28.1-4.
State agencies — Cooperation.

All state departments and agencies shall give all necessary aid and assistance to the various guidance councils in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 24, § 1.